Utah statutes.
63H-2-404.   Obligee rights -- Board may confer other rights.
(1)  In addition to a right that is conferred on an obligee of an authority
bond under this chapter and subject to contractual restrictions binding on the
obligee, an obligee may:
(a)  by mandamus, suit, action, or other proceeding:
(i)  compel the authority and its board, officers, agents, or employees to
perform every term, provision, and covenant contained in a contract of the
authority with or for the benefit of the obligee; and
(ii)  require the authority to carry out the covenants and agreements of the
authority and to fulfill the duties imposed on the authority by this part; and
(b)  by suit, action, or proceeding in equity, enjoin an act or things that
may be unlawful or violate the rights of the obligee.
(2) (a)  In a resolution authorizing the issuance of an authority bond or in a
trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract, the board may confer upon
an obligee holding or representing a specified amount in an authority bond, a
right described in Subsection (2)(b):
(i)  to accrue upon the happening of an event or default prescribed in the
resolution, indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract; and
(ii)  to be exercised by suit, action, or proceeding in a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(b) (i)  A right that the board may confer under Subsection (2)(a) is a right
to:
(A)  cause possession of all or part of a qualifying transmission project to
be surrendered to an obligee;
(B)  obtain the appointment of a receiver of all or part of:
(I)  a qualifying transmission project; and
(II)  the rents and profits from a qualifying transmission project; and
(C)  require the authority, its board, and its employees to account as if the
authority, board, and employees were the trustees of an express trust.
(ii)  If a receiver is appointed through the exercise of a right granted under
Subsection (2)(b)(i)(B), the receiver:
(A)  may:
(I)  enter and take possession of a qualifying transmission project or any
part of the qualifying transmission project;
(II)  operate and maintain the qualifying transmission project; and
(III)  collect and receive the fees, rents, revenues, or other charges arising
from the qualifying transmission project after the receiver's appointment; and
(B)  shall:
(I)  keep money collected as receiver for the authority in one or more
separate accounts; and
(II)  apply the money collected as receiver pursuant to the authority
obligations as the court directs.
